District of Columbia statutes.
50-102

Insurance, inspection, and registration required.

(a)

Any motor vehicle used for food delivery service shall be insured for the business purpose of food delivery by the food delivery service employer. The food delivery service employer shall certify quarterly with the Mayor that the motor vehicle is insured.

(b)

Any motor vehicle used for food delivery service, but not required to be registered in the District of Columbia under subchapter I of Chapter 15 of this title, shall be inspected annually pursuant to Chapter 6 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations. For this inspection, the Mayor shall prescribe an annual inspection fee of not less than $25, to be collected in the same manner as prescribed for motor vehicles registered in the District.

Sept. 20, 1990, D.C. Law 8-162, § 3, 37 DCR 4671
1981 Ed., § 40-1902.